Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5603.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-11 of the General Laws entitled "Certification of Teachers [See
Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended by adding
thereto the following section:
16-11-3.1. Emergency certification.
Notwithstanding any provisions of this chapter or any regulations to the contrary,
including, but not limited to, § 16-11-3, the Rhode Island council on elementary and secondary
education may, upon application, issue an emergency preliminary certificate to persons without
examination for a period of one school year. This emergency preliminary certificate may be
renewed annually, for four (4) additional school years, in order that the total time a person may
receive an emergency preliminary certificate shall be up to five (5) school years. Applications for
all renewals shall comply with the terms and conditions of 200 RICR 20-20 § 1.8.10.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002107
========